Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB265.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 326(a) and 503(h) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 326. Prohibitions.(a) General rule.--No licensed operator may:* * *(6.1) accept a credit card as a form of payment to fund a fantasy contest account;* * *§ 503. iLottery authorization.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 (h) Restrictions.--* * *(3) The department may not accept a credit card as a form of payment for the purchase of iLottery games.* * *Section 2. Section 13B23(a) of Title 4 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 13B23. Interactive gaming account credits, debits, deposits and payments.(a) Duty of board.--The board shall, by regulation, develop procedures to govern credits, debits and deposits to interactive gaming accounts. [Notwithstanding] Subject to subsection (c) and notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, all credits, debits and deposits to interactive gaming accounts shall be made in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board, in consultation with the department, and all payments of winnings shall be made in accordance with the rules of each authorized interactive game.* * *(c) Credit card payment prohibited.--An interactive gaming certificate holder may not accept a credit card as a form of payment for deposit or wager.Section 3. Section 13C11(a)(3) of Title 4 is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 13C11. Authorization to conduct sports wagering.(a) Persons who may be authorized.--* * *(3) * * *(iii) A sports wagering certificate holder may not accept a credit card as a form of payment for sports 20250SB0265PN0217 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wagering.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0265PN0217 - 3 - 123